Louisiana, session 2026, SB274.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2351.28 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2351.28. Data collection program
A. The secretary may establish and administer a program for the collection
and, analysis, and reporting of data on related to lead hazard detection and lead
hazard reduction activities in the state, and on the certification, accreditation, and
enforcement activities of the department.
B. The owner of any licensed day care center, preschool, or public or
nonpublic elementary school facility that qualifies as a child-occupied facility and,
operator, or governing authority of any proposed licensed early learning center,
a daycare center that is subject to federal daycare center licensing
requirements, a public prekindergarten program that is part of a public
elementary school, or an approved nonpublic prekindergarten program that is
part of an approved nonpublic elementary school which is first placed in
operation on or after August 1, 2012, 2026, shall have an inspector conduct an
inspection a risk assessor conduct a risk assessment of the facility and grounds for
the presence of paint, dust, and soil lead hazards. No inspection shall The results
of the risk assessment shall be attached to the original application for any
license required by a state department for the facility to operate. A risk
assessment shall not be required if the facility or its grounds has been inspected, has
had a risk assessment, or has been the subject of lead abatement or remediation
since 1978. If a portion of the facility or its grounds has not been inspected, has not
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 274 ENROLLED
had a risk assessment, or has not been the subject of lead abatement or remediation
since 1978, then those portions of the facility or its grounds shall be subject to the
provisions of this Section. The owner or, operator of the facility, or governing
authority shall maintain documentation that the inspection or lead abatement and
make available upon request documentation demonstrating that all required
inspections, risk assessments, abatement, or remediation activities were conducted
in accordance with applicable requirements. If a lead hazard is found to be present,
the inspector federal and state requirements. Prior to issuance of a license for
operation, the owner, operator, or governing authority shall submit the results
of the risk assessment to the department, the state Department of Education,
and the Louisiana Department of Health in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The risk assessor and the owner shall report those findings to the
state health officer, the Louisiana Department of Health, the state Department
of Education, and the secretary. The state health officer shall compile the results and
report the findings to the legislature in the annual Louisiana Health Report Card.
C.(1) If the results of the risk assessment indicate that lead hazards were
found, the department shall notify the Louisiana Department of Health and the
state Department of Education. The facility shall not commence operations until
appropriate lead hazard control methods have been implemented and
confirmed by the department.
(2) Once a report documenting the absence of lead hazards, either
initially or after any known lead hazards have been addressed, is provided to
the department, the Louisiana Department of Health, and the state Department
of Education, no further lead hazard testing shall be required for opening by
such owner, operator, or governing authority. Further lead testing may be
required if the owner, operator, or governing authority thereafter initiates
major alterations of the facility through renovation or remodeling. Further lead
testing may also be required if lead hazards are thereafter found on the
premises. However, renovated buildings shall qualify for a limited scope risk
assessment when determined appropriate by a certified risk assessor based on
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 274 ENROLLED
the nature and extent of renovations completed. The limited scope risk
assessment shall include soil samples, if bare soil is present.
D. The department shall provide a prospective owner, operator, or
governing authority of an early learning center, a daycare center that is subject
to federal daycare center licensing requirements, a public prekindergarten
program that is part of a public elementary school, or an approved nonpublic
prekindergarten program that is part of an approved nonpublic elementary
school with a list of persons approved or licensed to conduct the lead testing
required by this Subsection.
C.E. The secretary may enter into agreements a memorandum of agreement
with the Louisiana Department of Health and the state Department of Education
to implement this Section.
F. The state Department of Education shall provide notice of the
requirements of this Section to facilities requiring licensure pursuant to R.S.
17:407.31 et seq. For facilities not licensed by the state Department of
Education, the Department of Education shall publish information regarding
risk assessments.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.